Hawaii statutes.
PART V.
MISCELLANEOUS

[§587A-37] Failure to comply with terms and
conditions of an order of the court. If a party fails to comply with the
terms and conditions of an order issued by the court under this chapter, the
court may apply the provisions of section 710-1077 and any other provisions
available under the law. [L 2010, c 135, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next